Louisiana, session 2026, SB137.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1 R.S. 22:1261(A), 1262, 1264(A) and (C), 1265(A)(1) and (G), the
introductory paragraph of 1266(A), 1266(B)(2), (C), (D)(1), the introductory paragraph of
(E)(1), (E)(2), (G), and (M)(1), and 1267(A), the introductory paragraph of 1267(B),
1267(B)(2) and (3), (D)(1), (E)(1), and (G)(1), the introductory paragraph of 1267.1(A),
1267.1(E), 1268, 1269(A), (B)(2) and (4)(b), and (C), 1270(A), the introductory paragraph
of 1270(B)(1), and 1271 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-254 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 137
§1261. Renewal of policy; increase in premiums prohibited
A. Any An insurance policy terminating by it's the policy's terms at a
specified expiration date and not otherwise renewable may be renewed or extended
at the option of the insurer. Such The renewal shall be made upon a currently
authorized renewal form and at the premium rate then required for a specific
additional period or periods by a certificate or by endorsement of the policy, and
without requiring the issuance of a new policy.
* * *
§1262. Annulment of liability policies
No An insurance contract insuring against loss or damage through legal
liability for the bodily injury or death by accident of any individual, or for damage
to the property of any person, shall not be retroactively annulled by any agreement
between the insurer and insured after the occurrence of any such injury, death, or
damage for which the insured may be liable, and any such annulment attempted shall
be null and void.
* * *
§1264. Presumption of coverage
A. For losses that arose due to a catastrophic event for which a state of
disaster or emergency was declared pursuant to law by civil officials, for those areas
within the declaration, no damages to covered property shall not be automatically
denied by the inability of the policyholder to provide sufficient proof of loss within
the time limits and requirements of the policy. The time limit for the submission of
proof of loss shall be not less than one hundred eighty days. The time limit shall not
commence as long as a declaration of emergency is in existence and civil authorities
are denying the insured access to the property.
* * *
C. The provisions of this Section shall be applicable apply to all new policies
and renewal policies delivered in the state of Louisiana after April 18, 2006.
§1265. Property, casualty, and liability insurance policies; cancellation and
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-254 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 137
nonrenewal provisions; nonrenewal for rate inadequacy; certain
prohibitions
A.(1) Any insurer cancelling or refusing to renew a policy providing
property, casualty, or liability insurance on any property shall, upon written request
of the policy's named insured, specify in writing the reason or reasons for such
cancellation or refusal to renew. Such The request shall be mailed or delivered to the
insurer within six months after the effective date of cancellation or expiration.
* * *
G. No A homeowner's policy of insurance shall not contain any provision
that would apply more than one deductible to a loss resulting from any single
incident covered by the policy. Any such provision shall be null and void and
unenforceable as contrary to public policy.
* * *
§1266. Automobile, property, casualty, and liability insurance policies; cancellations
A. As used in this Part, the following definitions apply:
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(2) This Subsection shall does not apply to nonrenewal or to any policy or
coverage which has been in effect less than sixty days at the time notice of
cancellation is mailed or delivered by the insurer unless it is a renewal policy. After
an insurer has paid and satisfied an insured's third physical damage claim within a
period of five years, the modification of such the insured's automobile physical
damage coverage by the inclusion of or a change in a deductible not exceeding five
hundred dollars shall not be deemed a cancellation of the coverage or of the policy.
C. No An insurer shall not cancel or fail to renew a policy purely because of
age. Some legitimate reason, such as physical or mental infirmity, must be specified
before an insurer may cancel or refuse to renew a policy.
D.(1) No A notice of cancellation of a policy to which Subsection B or C of
this Section applies shall be is not effective unless mailed by certified mail or
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-254 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 137
delivered by the insurer to the named insured at least sixty days prior to the effective
date of cancellation; however, when cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, at
least ten days notice of cancellation accompanied by the reason shall be given. In the
event of nonpayment of premiums for a binder, a ten-day notice of cancellation shall
be required before the cancellation shall be effective. Notice of cancellation for
nonpayment of premiums is not required to be sent by certified mail. Unless the
reason accompanies the notice of cancellation, the notice of cancellation shall state
or be accompanied by a statement that upon written request of the named insured,
mailed or delivered to the insurer within six months after the effective date of
cancellation, the insurer will specify the reason for such the cancellation. This
Subsection does not apply to nonrenewal.
* * *
E.(1) No An insurer shall not fail to renew a policy unless it the insurer
mails or delivers to the named insured, at the address shown in the policy, at least
sixty days advance notice of its intention not to renew. This Subsection does not
apply in any of the following circumstances:
* * *
(2) Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel with respect
to grounds for cancellation which existed before the effective date of such the
renewal.
* * *
G. When a policy of automobile liability insurance is cancelled, other than
for nonpayment of premium, or in the event of failure to renew a policy of
automobile liability insurance to which Subsection D applies, the insurer shall notify
the named insured of his possible eligibility for automobile liability insurance
through the automobile liability assigned risk plan. Such The notice shall accompany
or be included in the notice of cancellation or the notice of intent not to renew.
* * *
M.(1) An insurance premium finance company that finances any part of an
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-254 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 137
insurance policy governed by this Section shall cooperate with the department in any
investigation regarding such the insurance policy.
* * *
§1267. Commercial insurance; cancellation and renewal
A. This Section shall apply applies to commercial property insurance
policies, commercial automobile insurance policies, commercial multi-peril
insurance policies, workers' compensation insurance, professional errors and
omissions policies, and commercial liability insurance policies, other than aviation,
and employers' liability insurance policies. It shall This Section does not apply to
reinsurance, excess and surplus lines insurance, residual market risks, multistate
location risks, policies subject to retrospective rating plans, excess or umbrella
policies, and such other policies that are exempted by the commissioner of insurance.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall mean
definitions apply:
* * *
(2) "Expiration date" means the date upon which coverage under a policy
ends. It also means, for a policy written for a term longer than one year or with no
fixed expiration date, each annual anniversary date of such the policy.
(3) "Nonpayment of premium" means the failure or inability of the named
insured to discharge any obligation in connection with the payment of premiums on
a policy of insurance subject to this regulation, whether such the payments are
payable directly to the insurer or its producer or indirectly payable under a premium
finance plan or extension of credit.
* * *
D.(1) An insurer may decide not to renew a policy if it delivers or mails to
the first-named insured at the address shown on the policy written notice it will not
renew the policy. Such The notice of nonrenewal shall be mailed or delivered at least
sixty days before the expiration date. Such The notice to the insured shall include the
insured's loss run information for the period the policy has been in force within, but
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-254 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 137
not to exceed, the last three years of coverage. If the notice is mailed less than sixty
days before expiration, coverage shall remain in effect under the same terms and
conditions until sixty days after notice is mailed or delivered. Earned premium for
any period of coverage that extends beyond the expiration date shall be considered
pro rata based upon the previous year's rate. For purposes of this Section, the transfer
of a policyholder between companies within the same insurance group shall not be
a refusal to renew. In addition, changes in the deductible, changes in rate, changes
in the amount of insurance, or reductions in policy limits or coverage shall not be
refusals to renew.
* * *
E.(1) An insurer shall mail or deliver to the named insured at the mailing
address shown on the policy written notice of any rate increase, change in deductible,
or reduction in limits or coverage at least sixty days prior to the expiration date of
the policy. If the insurer fails to provide such the notice, the coverage provided to
the named insured at the expiring policy's rate, terms, and conditions shall remain in
effect until notice is given or until the effective date of replacement coverage
obtained by the named insured, whichever first occurs. For the purposes of this
Subsection, notice is considered given sixty days following date of mailing or
delivery of the notice. If the insured elects not to renew, any earned premium for the
period of extension of the terminated policy shall be calculated pro rata at the lower
of the current or previous year's rate. If the insured accepts the renewal, the premium
increase, if any, and other changes shall be effective the day following the prior
policy's expiration or anniversary date.
* * *
G.(1) An insurance premium finance company that finances any part of an
insurance policy governed by this Section shall cooperate with the department in any
investigation regarding such the insurance policy.
* * *
§1267.1. Commercial insurance deductibles applied to named storm, hurricane, and
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-254 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 137
wind and hail deductibles
A. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
* * *
E. This Section shall apply applies only to property located in this state.
§1268. Interest on refund; exception
A. Any refund due an insured by an insurer writing or delivering insurance
policies excluding health insurance, life insurance, and annuities in the state because
of either cancellation, elimination, or reduction of coverage by the insurer or the
insured, shall be accompanied with interest at the rate of one and one-half percent
per month of the amount of the refund due the customer, without the benefit of daily
proration of this monthly interest, after thirty days of either of the following:
(1) The delivery to the insured of the written notice of such the cancellation,
elimination, or reduction.
(2) Delivery to the insurer's state, regional, or home office, from which such
the refund would issue, of the written request for such the cancellation, elimination,
or reduction. An insurer shall be deemed in compliance with this Section and not
subject to the further accruement of interest by furnishing timely evidence of the
mailing of such the refund to the last known address of the insured. However, when
the insured continues to maintain a policy of insurance with the insurer, or an
affiliated insurer, and the amount of the refund plus interest is twenty-five dollars or
less, the insurer may credit the amount of the payment against future premiums. The
insurer shall give written notice to the insured of the credit and the amount at policy
renewal.
B. The provisions of this Section shall do not apply to those policies issued
by an insurance company which require an audit.
§1269. Liability policy; insolvency or bankruptcy of insured and inability to effect
service of citation or other process; direct action against insurer
A. No A policy or contract of liability insurance shall not be issued or
delivered in this state, unless it contains provisions to the effect that the insolvency
Page 7 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-254 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 137
or bankruptcy of the insured shall not release the insurer from the payment of
damages for injuries sustained or loss occasioned during the existence of the policy,
and any judgment which may be rendered against the insured for which the insurer
is liable which shall have become executory, shall be deemed prima facie evidence
of the insolvency of the insured, and an action may thereafter be maintained within
the terms and limits of the policy by the injured person, or his survivors, mentioned
in Civil Code Art. 2315.1, or heirs against the insurer.
B.(1) * * *
* * *
(2) This right of direct action shall exist whether or not the policy of
insurance sued upon was written or delivered in the state of Louisiana and whether
or not such the policy contains a provision forbidding such direct action, provided
the accident or injury occurred within the state of Louisiana. Nothing contained in
this Section shall be construed to affect the provisions of the policy or contract if
such the provisions are not in violation of the laws of this state.
* * *
(4)(a) * * *
(b) A court shall not disclose the existence of insurance coverage to the jury
or mention such the coverage in the jury's presence unless required by Code of
Evidence Article 411.
* * *
C. It is the intent of this Section that any action brought under the provisions
of this Section shall be subject to all of the lawful conditions of the policy or contract
and the defenses which could be urged by the insurer to a direct action brought by
the insured, provided the terms and conditions of such the policy or contract are not
in violation of the laws of this state.
* * *
§1270. Personal property; specific coverage; valuation; exemptions
A. In any case in which a policy includes coverage for loss of or damage to
Page 8 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-254 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 137
personal property of the insured, from whatever cause, if the insurer places a
valuation upon the specific item of covered property and uses such the valuation for
purposes of determining the premium charge to be made under the policy, the insurer
shall compute any covered loss of or damage to such the property which occurs
during the term of the policy at such the valuation without deduction or offset, unless
a different method is to be used in the computation of loss, in which latter case, the
policy, and any application for the policy, shall set forth in type of prominent size,
the actual method of such the loss computation by the insurer.
B.(1) The provisions of this Section shall do not apply to any of the
following:
* * *
§1271. Identification of property upon which premium is due
A. Any bill or other notice requiring payment of a premium for a policy of
property or casualty insurance which is sent by an insurer to its policyholder shall
identify the insured property sufficiently to allow the policyholder to identify the
property upon which the premium is due. Such The identification may be by
description or may be by address if the property is real estate.
B. The provisions of Subsection A of this Section shall do not apply to bills
for policies which are billed more often than semiannually or to bills for policies
which insure multiple properties, locations, or vehicles.